contrib/dict/hyph_de_DE.dic
yp3an
yp2e2
y2pf
y3ph
y2p1in
y1p2o3
y4p3s
y1r
y3r2e
y3ri
yri2a
yr2i1e
y3r4o
y2r1r2
ys2an
y1sa
y3s2c
y1se1
y3s2h
y4s3l2
ys1me3
y2s3m2
ys2p2o
y1sp2
ys1p2r2
ys3t4
y1s4ty1
y2s1u2
y3s2z
y1t2
y3te.
y1te
y3tes
y3to1
yu2r
y2u1re3
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
2z3a2b
zab3l2
za1c
z1a2d
za3de
2z1af
za3g2r4
za1g
3zah
2z3a2k
z2a1le3
2z1a4l1l
2z1am
z1an
za2na
2z3a2n1f
3z2a3ni
2z3a2n3l2
2z1a2r1b
2z1a2r1c
z1a4r1m
z1ar3t2i
za4r1t
zar2t2r4
2z1a2r1z
z1as
za1s1t4
2z3a1t3
3z2a2u1b
za2u
z1au2f
z3a2u1g
3z4aun1
zä2
2z1äc
3z2äh
2z1äm
z1ä4r1g
z1ä4r1m
4z3b4
zb1ü1b
zbübe3
2z3c
2z3d2
zdan2
zdä1
2z1e2b2en
ze1b
2zecho
zec4h
2z1ec4k
z4e1e
2z1e2f1f
ze1f
ze2i1k4
zei3la
ze4il
zei1le4
2z1ein
zei3s4
zeis3t4
zei2t1a
ze2it
zeit5e2n1d
zei3te
zei3te4n
zei4t3er
zei2t2r4
ze2l1a2
ze2len
ze1le
ze2l1er
ze2l1in
z2e1li
zell2a
ze4l1l
zel3s1z
ze4l1s
zel3t2h
ze4l1t
z2e1lu2
2z1e2m1p
ze1m
5zen.
z2e4n3ac
ze2n1a
ze4n3n
ze2no
zen1s2e
ze6n1s
z1en4se1m
3ze4n1t
zen4t3s
zen4zer
ze2n1z
z2er.
ze2r3a
ze2r1e2b
ze1re
2z1ergä
ze4r1g
4z3erge1b
zer1ge
z3erhal
zer3h4
ze2rha
2ze2r1h2ö
ze2r1i2n4t
z2e1ri
ze2r1k2
z2erl.
ze4r1l
2zer1l2ö
z2e4rn
zer4ne1b
zer3ne
zer4n3ei
ze2ro
2z1er1q
ze4r1s2
2z1er1s2a
4z3ers1t2e
zers1t
zer1t1a4
ze4r1t
zer4t3a1g
zert4an
zer6te1re
zer1te
zer4tin
z4er1ti
zer6tra2u
zer1t2r4
4zerwe2i
ze2r1w
2z1e2r1z
3z2erza
ze2sä
ze3s2c
ze1s1e
ze1s1i
ze3s3ku
ze2s1k2
z2e2sp2
zessen4
zes3se
ze6s1s
zes6s5e2n1d
zes2sp2
zes2s1t
ze2s3t
ze3s2ta
z2e2t2r4
ze1t
2zet2ts
ze4t1t
2z1ex
2z1f4
2z1g2
zge1r2a
z1ge
2z1h
z2hen
zh2i2r3
zi3a1lo
zi1a
z2ial
zi3ar
z2i2d3r4
zi1d
zi1er3h4
zie4r1s1
zi1es.
zi1l2e
2z1i2m1p
z2i1n2e
zin4er
2z1i2n3f
2z1i2n1h4
zi2n1it
zi1ni
zin2sa
zi6n1s
zin4ser
zin1se
4z1in2s1u2f
zin3su
2z1i2n1v2
z2i2o3
zi3o1p
z2i2r1k2
zir2k6s
zi3s2z
zi1t2h
2z1j
2z3k4
2z1l2
2z1m2
zm4e2e
z1me
2z3n4
2z1o1b
2z1of
zo2gl
z2o1g
2z1oh
3z2ol
zon4ter
zo2n1t
zon1te
zo2o
2zop2e
z1or
zo2ri
zor4ne
zo4rn
2z1o2s1z
2z3o1t
2z1ö2f
z1öl
2z2ön
2z3p4
2z1q
2z3r2
4z1s2
z3sa
z3s1h
z3s1k2
z3s1z
2z1t
z2t1a2u
z1ta
z4te1he
z1te
z2teh
z3t2her
zt1h
zth2e
z1t3ho
zt1i6n1s
z1ti
z3tö
z4t3rec
z1t2r4
zt1re
z2t3s2
z3tü
zu1
z2u3a
z2u1b4
zu4c4h
z2uc
zu3cke
zuc4k
z2u1d4
zu1di4
zu2el
z2u1e
zu3f4
zu2g1ar
z2u1g
zu4ge4n1t
zu1ge
zu3gen
zu3g1l
zug1un1
zu1gu
2z1u2hr
zu1h
zu3k
2z1um.
zum2en2
zu1me
2z1u2m1f4
2z1u4m1g2
2z1u4m3l2
2z1u2m1s
zu3n2e
zun1
zu4n1g4
2z1u2n1t
zu2p2f1i
zu3r2a
z1u2r1k
2z1u4r1l
2z1u4r1s
2z1u4r1t2
z2u3s4
z2u5t2
z2u1z2
2z1üb
zü2r1c
2z1v
zw2
z1wac
zw2a
4z1wah
zwa2n2d1
z2wa4n1g
z1war
2z1was
4z1wäl
zw2ä
2z1we1g
z2we2i1g
zwe2i
z1weis
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
z2we4r1g
2z1wes
2z1we1t
4z1wi4r
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
zw2u
2z1wü
4z1z
z3z4a
zzi1s4
z3z2o
zz2ö
